Louisiana, session 2026, SB167.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Code of Civil Procedure Art. 1672(C) is hereby amended and reenacted
and Code of Civil Procedure Art. 1201(E) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
Art. 1201. Citation; waiver; delay for service
* * *
E. Service of citation shall not issue until the party who requests service
first deposits with the clerk of court a sum of money sufficient to pay all fees for
service of citation within the ninety day period set forth for the request of
service of citation pursuant to this Article.
* * *
Art. 1672. Involuntary dismissal
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-82 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 167
* * *
C. A judgment dismissing an action without prejudice shall be rendered as
to a person named as a defendant for whom service has not been requested or for
whom all fees for service of citation have not been paid within the time prescribed
by Article 1201(C) or 3955 upon the sustaining of a declinatory exception filed by
such defendant, or upon contradictory motion of any other party, unless good cause
is shown why service could not be requested or all fees for service of citation have
not been paid, in which case the court may order that service be effected and all
fees for service of citation paid within a specified time.
Section 2. The provisions of this Act shall have prospective application only.